South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-29-120(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) On November eleventh of each year, which is a legal holiday in this State as provided by Section 53-5-10 to commemorate and honor veterans, all elementary, middle, and high schools in this State if they are open, shall devote at least one hour of the school day in either classroom instruction or at a student body assembly program to study the history and meaning of the holiday, to partake in activities that allow students to express their appreciation for the commitment and sacrifice of veterans past and present, and to highlight the connection between the purpose of democracy and the role American veterans play. Each school shall include opportunities to celebrate and remember veterans from the school, veterans at the school, or veterans connected to teachers, staff, or students of the school United States Constitution and the Declaration of Independence. If any such school is not open on November eleventh, then this instruction or assembly program must be given on the day the school is open immediately preceding November eleventh. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----